Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0756.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1506. An officer of the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy shall not, in the exercise of the officer's powers and duties under this act, enter private property without a warrant or the explicit or implied permission of the property owner or lessee of the property.